apertium-ewo.ewo.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Ewondo

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<abbr%> ! abréviation ; abbreviation
%<adv%> ! Adverbe ; Adverb
%<adj%> ! Adjectif ; Adjective
%<adjind%> ! Adjectif ; Adjective
%<card%> ! Numéral cardinal ; Cardinal Numeral
%<cm%> ! Virgule
%<cnjcoo%> !  conjonction de coordiation ;Co-ordinating conjunction
%<cnsub%> ! conjonction de subordination ; subordinating conjunction
%<conn%> ! Connective
%<cop%> ! Copule
%<dem%> ! Démonstratif ; Demonstrative
%<det%> ! Déterminant
%<ij%> ! Interjection
%<lquot%> ! guillemets ouvrants
%<loc%> ! Locatif ; locative
%<lpar%> ! parenthèses ouvrantes
%<mod%> ! particule modale
%<n%>   ! Nom ; Noun
%<np%> ! Noun propre
%<pos%> ! Possessive adjectives
%<post%> ! Postposition
%<pr%> ! Préposition
%<prn%> ! Pronoun
%<ord%> ! Numéral ordinal ; Ordinal Numeral
%<rel%> ! Marqueur relatif ! Relative marker
%<rpar%> ! parenthèses fermantes
%<rquot%> ! guillemets fermants
%<sent%> ! Ponctuation de fin de phrase (point)
%<vaux%> ! Verbe auxiliaire
%<vbhaber%> ! Verbe avoir
%<vblex%> ! Verbe ; Verb
%<vbser%> ! Verbe être
%<vbmod%> ! Verbe modal

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Pluriel ; Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singulier ;Singular

! Noun class morphology
%<cl0%> ! Noun class 1 ; classe nominale 1
%<cl1%> ! Noun class 1a ; classe nominale 1a
%<cl1a%> ! Noun class 1a ; classe nominale 1a 
%<cl2%> ! Noun class 2 ; classe nominale 2
%<cl3%> ! Noun class 3 ; classe nominale 3
%<cl4%> ! Noun class 4 ; classe nominale 4
%<cl5%> ! Noun class 5 ; classe nominale 5
%<cl5a%> ! Noun class 5a ; classe nominale 5a
%<cl5b%> ! Noun class 5b ; classe nominale 5b
%<cl5c%> ! Noun class 5c ; classe nominale 5c
%<cl5d%> ! Noun class 5a ; classe nominale 5d
%<cl6%> ! Noun class 6 ; classe nominale 6
%<cl6a%> ! Noun class 6a ; classe nominale 6a
%<cl7%> ! Noun class 7 ; classe nominale 7
%<cl8%> ! Noun class 8 ; classe nominale 8
%<cl9%> ! Noun class 9 ; classe nominale 9
%<cl10%> ! Noun class 10 ; classe nominale 10
%<cl11%> ! Noun class 11 ; classe nominale 11


! Verb morphology
%<inf%> ! Infinitive ; infinitif
%<imp%> ! Impératif ; Imperative
%<ins%> ! Instrumental ; Instrumental
%<neg%> ! Négation ; Negation
%<refl%> ! Reflexif ; Reflexive
%<p1%> ! Immediate past ; passé immédiat
%<p2%> ! Recent past ; passé récent
%<p3%> ! Remote past ; passé lointain
%<f1%> ! Immediate future ; futur immédiat
%<f2%> ! Near future ; futur récent
%<p3%> ! Distant future ; futur lointain

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary
%<punct%> ! Ponctuation ; Punctuation


%{ë%}
%{N%}

! Flags for Number
@P.Number.Sg@
@P.Number.Pl@
@R.Number.Sg@
@R.Number.Pl@

! Flags for Noun classes
@P.Class.1@
@P.Class.1a@
@P.Class.2@
@P.Class.3@
@P.Class.4@
@P.Class.5@
@P.Class.5a@
@P.Class.5b@
@P.Class.5c@
@P.Class.5d@
@P.Class.6@
@P.Class.6a@
@P.Class.7@
@P.Class.8@
@P.Class.9@
@P.Class.10@
@P.Class.11@
@P.Class.16@
@R.Class.1@
@R.Class.1a@
@R.Class.2@
@R.Class.3@
@R.Class.4@
@R.Class.5@
@R.Class.5a@
@R.Class.5b@
@R.Class.5c@
@R.Class.5d@
@R.Class.6@
@R.Class.6a@
@R.Class.7@
@R.Class.8@
@R.Class.9@
@R.Class.10@
@R.Class.11@
@R.Class.16@


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                     	 PREFIXES        	                    !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

ADV ;
Number ;
V ;
POS ;
PR ;
CONJ ;
Pronoms;

LEXICON Pronoms 

a%<prn%>%<cl1%>:a # ;


LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON PR

%<pr%>: # ;

LEXICON CONJ 
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON Number

@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@m%> StemsCl1 ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@%> StemsCl1a ;
@P.Number.Pl@:@P.Number.Pl@b%{ë%}%> StemsCl2 ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@%{N%}%> StemsCl3 ;
@P.Number.Pl@:@P.Number.Pl@min%> StemsCl4 ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@a%> StemsCl5 ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@dz%> StemsCl5a ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@d%> StemsCl5b ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@l%> StemsCl5c ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@y%> StemsCl5d ;
@P.Number.Pl@:@P.Number.Pl@m%{ë%}%> StemsCl6 ;
@P.Number.Pl@:@P.Number.Pl@m%{ë%}%> StemsCl6a ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@e%> StemsCl7 ;
@P.Number.Pl@:@P.Number.Pl@bi%> StemsCl8 ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@ StemsCl9 ;
@P.Number.Pl@:@P.Number.Pl@ StemsCl10 ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@o%> StemsCl11 ;
@P.Number.Sg@:@P.Number.Sg@ StemsCl16 ;


LEXICON StemsCl1 !  Stems in Noun class 1

@P.Class.1@:@P.Class.1@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl1a !  Stems in Noun class 1a

@P.Class.1a@:@P.Class.1a@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl2 ! Stems in Noun class 2

@P.Class.2@:@P.Class.2@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl3 ! Stems in Noun class 3
 
@P.Class.3@:@P.Class.3@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl4 ! Stems in Noun class 4

@P.Class.4@:@P.Class.4@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl5 ! Stems in Noun class 5
 
@P.Class.5@:@P.Class.5@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl5a ! Stems in Noun class 5a
 
@P.Class.5a@:@P.Class.5a@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl5b ! Stems in Noun class 5b
 
@P.Class.5b@:@P.Class.5b@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl5c ! Stems in Noun class 5c
 
@P.Class.5c@:@P.Class.5c@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl5d ! Stems in Noun class 5d
 
@P.Class.5d@:@P.Class.5d@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl6 ! Stems in Noun class 6
 
@P.Class.6@:@P.Class.6@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl6a ! Stems in Noun class 6a
 
@P.Class.6a@:@P.Class.6a@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl7 ! Stems in Noun class 7
 
@P.Class.7@:@P.Class.7@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl8 ! Stems in Noun class 8
 
@P.Class.8@:@P.Class.8@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl9 ! Stems in Noun class 9
 
@P.Class.9@:@P.Class.9@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl10 ! Stems in Noun class 10
 
@P.Class.10@:@P.Class.10@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl11 ! Stems in Noun class 11
 
@P.Class.11@:@P.Class.11@ Stems ;

LEXICON StemsCl16 ! Stems in Noun class 16
 
@P.Class.16@:@P.Class.16@ Stems ;


LEXICON SuffCl1

@R.Class.1@:@R.Class.1@	# ;

LEXICON SuffCl1a

@R.Class.1a@:@R.Class.1a@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl2

@R.Class.2@:@R.Class.2@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl3

@R.Class.3@:@R.Class.3@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl4

@R.Class.4@:@R.Class.4@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl5

@R.Class.5@:@R.Class.5@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl5a

@R.Class.5a@:@R.Class.5a@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl5b

@R.Class.5b@:@R.Class.5b@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl5c

@R.Class.5c@:@R.Class.5c@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl5d

@R.Class.5d@:@R.Class.5d@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl6

@R.Class.6@:@R.Class.6@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl6a

@R.Class.6a@:@R.Class.6a@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl7

@R.Class.7@:@R.Class.7@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl8

@R.Class.8@:@R.Class.8@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl9

@R.Class.9@:@R.Class.9@	# ;

LEXICON SuffCl10

@R.Class.10@:@R.Class.10@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl11

@R.Class.11@:@R.Class.11@ # ;

LEXICON SuffCl16

@R.Class.16@:@R.Class.16@ # ;


LEXICON Gender-1 ! cl1-cl2 pairing 

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl1%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl1 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl2%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl2 ;

LEXICON Gender-1a ! cl1a-cl2 pairing 

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl1a%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl1a ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl2%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl2 ;

LEXICON Gender-2 ! cl3-cl4 pairing

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl3%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl3 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl4%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl4 ;

LEXICON Gender-2a ! one class gender (cl3)

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl3%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl3 ;
@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl3%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl3 ;

LEXICON Gender-2b ! one class gender (cl4) 

@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl4%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl4 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl4%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl4 ;

LEXICON Gender-3 ! cl5-cl6 pairing

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl5%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl5 ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl6%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl6 ;

LEXICON Gender-3a ! cl5a-cl6 pairing

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl5a%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl5a ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl6%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl6 ;

LEXICON Gender-3b ! cl5b-cl6 pairing

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl5b%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl5b ;
@R.Number.Pl@%<n%>%<cl6%>%<pl%>:@R.Number.Pl@ SuffCl6 ;

LEXICON Gender-3c ! cl5c one-class gender

@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl5c%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl5c ;
!@R.Number.Sg@%<n%>%<cl5c%>%<sg%>:@R.Number.Sg@ SuffCl5c ;

LEXICON Stems
abui:abui ADV ; ! " plusieurs" ; "many"
afi:afi PR ; ! "malgré" ; "despite"
ai:ai CONJ ; ! "avec" ; "with"  
am:am Gender-3a ; ! "affaire"
anë:anë ADV ; ! "comme" ; "like"
al:al Gender-3a ; ! "village" ; "village"
asu:asu CONJ ; ! "pour" ; "for"
banda:banda Gender-2 ; ! "invitation" ; "invitation"
be:be Gender-3 ; ! "mal" ; "wrong"
bè:bè Gender-2 ; ! "porte" ; "door"
bebe:bebe ADV ; ! "proche" ; "near of"
bëgë:bëgë Gender-2 ; ! "charge" ; "luggage"
bëǹa:bëǹa Gender-3 ; ! "cloche" ; "bell"
bie:bie Gender-1 ; ! "géniteur" ; "parent"
bil:bil Gender-2 ; ! "course" ; "race"
bò:bò Gender-3 ; ! "pied" ; "foot"
bòd:bòd Gender-1 ; ! "accoutrement" ; "fashion"
fòg:bòg Gender-2 ; ! "un" ; "one" ## analyse not complete
bomanë:bomanë Gender-2 ; ! "contour" ; "edge"
bonde:bonde Gender-1 ; ! "fondateur" ; "founder"
bud:budubu Gender-3 ; ! "cachoterie" ; "secrecy, concealment" ## analysis not complete (gloss missing for suffixes -ub and -u)
byan:byan Gender-2 ; ! "mollet" ; "calf"
daǹdaǹ:daǹdaǹ ADV ; ! "surtout" ; ! "especially"
dò:dò CONJ ; ! "alors" ; "then"
dòg:dòg Gender-2 ; ! "voracité" ; "voracity"
dzoe:dzoe Gender-1 ; ! "dirigeant" ; "ruler"
dzugu:dzugu ADV ; ! "avoir l'habitude de" ; "be use to"
esia:esia Gender-1a ; ! "son père" ; " his/her father"
esia:esoa Gender-1a ; ! "ton père" ; "your father"
evuesiǹ:esuesiǹ ADV ; ! "peut-être" ; "may be"
fia:fia Gender-1a ; ! "avocat" ; "avocado"
fila:fila Gender-1a ; ! "oreiller" ; "pillow"
fiaǹ:fiaǹ Gender-2 ; ! "sauce" ; "sauce"
fola:fola Gender-3 ; ! "endroit" ; "location"
fò:fò ADV ; ! "aussi" ; "as well"
gal:gal Gender-1 ; ! "female" ; "female"
ka:ka Gender-1 ; ! "assistant"  ; "helper"
kada:kada Gender-1a ; ! "crabe" ; "crab"
kaǹ:kaǹ ADV ; ! "odeur de roussi" ; "smell of singed"
fë:fë ADV ; ! "aussi" ; "also"
kie:kie Gender-3 ; ! "feuille" ; "leave"
kig:kig ADV ; ! "ne... pas" ; "not"
kòbò:kòbò Gender-2 ; ! "langue" ; "language"
kog:kogo Gender-3 ; ! "démultiplication" ; "leverage" ## analysis not complete
kom:komo Gender-1 ; ! "fabriquant" ; "maker"
kon:kon Gender-1a ; ! "fantôme" ; "ghost"
kòm:kòm ADV ; ! "longtemps" ; "long"
ku:ku Gender-2a ; ! "sel" ; "salt"
kug:kug Gender-3 ; ! "bord" ; "side"
kugu:kugu Gender-1a ; ! "cuisinier" ; "cook"
kulu:kulu Gender-1a ; ! "tortue" ; "tortle"
kulu:kulu Gender-1 ; ! "tornade" ; "tornado"
laǹan:laǹan Gender-3 ; ! "(action de) lambiner" ; "dwadle"
lo:lo Gender-2 ; ! "tête" ; "head"
log:log Gender-3a ; ! "pêche au barrage" ; "traditionnal fishing at dam"
mag:mag Gender-3 ; ! "amas" ; "cluster"
mawòd:mawòd Gender-1a ; ! "maçon" ; "mason"
mëtua:mëtua Gender-1a ; ! "voiture"; "car"
nal:nal Gender-2b ; ! "mensonge" ; "lie"
nëǹ:nëǹ Gender-1 ; ! "hôte" ; "guest"
ngëǹ:ngëǹ ADV ; ! "clair" ; "clear"
ngoǹ:ngoǹ Gender-3 ; ! "cadenas" ; "lock"
nyala:nyala Gender-1 ; ! "beau-frère" ; "brother-in-law"
oap:oap Gender-3b ; ! "nombril" ; "navel"
oe:oe Gender-3c ; ! "rire" ; "laughter"
ooga:ooga Gender-3a ; ! "articulation" ; "joint"
ongo:ongo Gender-3a ; ! "calamité" ; "disaster"
òngò:òngò Gender-1 ; ! "enfant" ; "child"
odo:odo Gender-1 ; ! "humanité" ; "humanity"
sëm:sëm Gender-2 ; ! "péché" ; "sin"
si:si Gender-1a ; ! "terre" ; "earth"
sie:sie Gender-3 ; ! "cabinet" ; "office"
soanga:soanga Gender-1a ; ! "ma tante paternelle" ; "paternal aunt"
soanga:esanga Gender-1a ; ! "sa tante paternelle" ; "his/her paternal aunt"
sòbò:sòbò Gender-1a ; ! "savon" ; "soap"
sos:sos Gender-2 ; ! "médisance" ; "mudslinging"
tela:tela Gender-1a ; ! "tailleur" ; "tailor"
tie:tie Gender-2b ; ! "douleur" ; "pain, ache"
tom:tom Gender-3 ; ! "méchanceté" ; "evil"
tug:tug Gender-2 ; ! "action de frotter"
tum:tum Gender-2 ; ! "canne" ; "canne, rod"
vë:vë Gender-1 ; ! "donateur" ; "funder"
vus:vus Gender-2a ; ! "derrière" ; "back"
vus:vus Gender-2a ; ! "derrière" ; "back" 
wulu:wulu Gender-1 ; ! "marcher" ; "walker"
ye:ye Gender-3a ; ! "période" ; "period"
yëm:yëm Gender-3 ; ! "handicape" ; "disability"
yom:yom Gender-3 ; ! "caducité" ; "lapse"
zimbi:zimbi Gender-1 ; ! "soldat" ; "soldier"
